Massachusetts, session 194th, H3816.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 2 of chapter 90 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting
after line 663, as appearing in the 2020 Official Edition, the following paragraph:-
The registrar shall furnish without charge to the owner of a private passenger motor
vehicle who is a parent, sibling, child, or spouse of a police officer of a police department of any
city or town, the department of state police, the Massachusetts bay transportation authority police
department, or police officer of a Massachusetts public higher education campus, who has been
killed in the line of duty, upon presentation of satisfactory evidence to the registrar, a distinctive
registration plate that reads "Blue Star Family" for 1 private passenger motor vehicle owned and
principally used by that person or a distinctive "Blue Star Family" emblem to be affixed to a
registration plate for a motorcycle privately owned and principally used by that person. The
of 4

registrar may issue a distinctive "Blue Star Family" registration of up to 6 characters for 1 private
passenger motor vehicle owned and principally used by that person. A police officer shall be
determined to have been killed in the line of duty for purposes of this paragraph if the
circumstance meets those which would make them eligible to be placed on the National Law
Enforcement Memorial in Washington D.C.
SECTION 2. Section 7C of chapter 89 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2020
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out subsection 2(c) in its entirety and inserting in
place thereof:-
(c) Violation of this section may be punished by a fine of $250 for a first offense, by a
fine of $500 for a second offense, and by a fine of $1,000 for a third or subsequent offense;
provided that any violation that results in injury to another person may be punished by a fine of
$2,500 or up to one year in jail or house of correction.
And further, by adding the following sections:-
(d) In addition to any fines pursuant to subsection (c), an operator who commits a second
or third offense shall be required to complete a program selected by the registrar of motor
vehicles that encourages a change in driver behavior and attitude about the "Move Over Law".
(e) A first or second offense under this section shall not be a surchargeable incident under
section 113B of chapter 175 or under motor vehicle liability policy as defined in section 34A that
is issued pursuant to said chapter 175; provided, however, that a third or subsequent offense shall
be a surchargeable incident under said section 113B of said chapter 175 or under a motor vehicle
liability policy as defined in said section 34A that is issued pursuant to said chapter 175.
of 4

(f) Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, upon receipt of the
payment of fines issued under this section, the state comptroller shall immediately cause not less
than 50% of the total to be transferred to registry of motor vehicles to be held as retained
revenue, provided said revenue shall be used to defray the 100 per cent of the annual cost
associated with section 1 of this act, and further, the remaining balance shall be transferred to the
state treasurer to supplement costs associated with section 3 of this act.
SECTION 3. Chapter 10 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2020 Official Edition,
is hereby amended by inserting after section 35PPP the following section:-
Section 35QQQ. There shall be established and set up on the books of the
Commonwealth a separate fund to be known as the Massachusetts Law Enforcement Memorial
Fund to be used without appropriation by a department of public safety for the purpose of
making annual payments to the Massachusetts Law Enforcement Memorial to memorialize and
honor Massachusetts law enforcement personnel killed in the line of duty. There shall be credited
to the fund revenues received by the Commonwealth from the sale of registration plates under
section 2G of chapter 90.
SECTION 4. Section 18¾ of chapter 6A of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2008
Official Edition, is hereby amended by adding the following clause:-
(10) to develop and implement a statewide blue alert system to be activated when law
enforcement officials are searching for an individual who is wanted in the serious injury or
killing of a police officer, state trooper, or other law enforcement official.
SECTION 5. Chapter 6A of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2008 Official Edition,
is hereby amended by inserting after section 19A the following section:-
of 4

Section 19B. The executive office of public safety shall coordinate the implementation of
a statewide blue alert system, pursuant to section 21 of chapter 22.
SECTION 6. Chapter 22 of The General Laws are hereby amended by adding the
following section:-
Section 21. THE STATEWIDE BLUE ALERT SYSTEM
Section 1. The following terms as used in this chapter shall, unless the context clearly
appears otherwise, have the following meanings:
“Executive office”, the executive office of public safety.
"Law enforcement agency", a law enforcement agency with jurisdiction over the
investigation of a crime resulting in the serious injury or death of a police officer, state trooper,
or other law enforcement official.
of 4